Massachusetts, session 194th, H4500.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
That notwithstanding Chapter132B of the General Laws or any other general or special
law to the contrary, the Town of Concord may by ordinance prohibit the application of second-
generation anticoagulant rodenticides within the Town of Concord, including application of such
pesticides by licensed commercial applicators as defined in 333 C.M.R. 10.00, except as allowed
by the Board of Health to remediate a public health condition; this act shall take effect upon its
passage.
of 1